Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) In interpreting a state statute, rule and regulation or
document that has the force and effect of law, a state court or an
administrative hearing officer hearing an administrative action may
consider but shall not defer to a state agency's interpretation of such
statute, rule and regulation or document and shall interpret the meaning
and effect of such statute, rule and regulation or document de novo.
(b) In an action brought by or against a state agency, after applying all
customary tools of interpretation and rules of statutory construction
pursuant to law, a state court or an administrative hearing officer hearing
an administrative action shall exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a
reasonable interpretation that limits the state agency's powers and
maximizes individual liberty a way that is consistent with an individual's
fundamental constitutional rights.
(c) As used in this section, "rule and regulation" and "state agency"
mean the same as defined in K.S.A. 77-602, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.